Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.110

Delivery of record.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, United States mail, private courier service, and electronic transmission.

(2) Records may be delivered to the secretary of state by electronic transmission as authorized by the secretary of state pursuant to RCW 23.95.115(2). The secretary of state may deliver a record to an entity by electronic transmission if the entity has designated an address, location, or system to which the record may be electronically transmitted.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1103.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.